Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-241.10
Bingo cards; requirements; department; rules and regulations.

(1) An organization licensed to conduct bingo under a Class II license shall not use any reusable hard bingo card or shutter card to conduct bingo.

(2) All licensed organizations shall accurately account for and report the sale, use, rental, or lease of all bingo cards used at each bingo occasion. The department shall prescribe by rule and regulation the method by which such sale, use, rental, or lease is to be recorded, including, but not limited to, the manner in which all bingo cards are to be issued and receipted at a bingo occasion.

(3) The department shall establish by rule and regulation the manner in which bingo shall be conducted, including rules for the methods of conducting and playing bingo and for the utilization of bingo supplies and bingo equipment to insure that each player is afforded a fair and equal opportunity to win.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 47;

Laws 2003, LB 429, § 6.